Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1980.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 910(b) of the act of March 20, 2002 (P.L.154, No.13), known as the Medical Care Availability and Reduction of Error (Mcare) Act, is amended to read:Section 910. Continuing medical education.* * *(b) Required completion.--Beginning with the licensure 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 period commencing January 1, 2003, and following written notice to licensees by the licensure board, individuals licensed to practice medicine and surgery without restriction shall be required to enroll and complete 100 hours of mandatory continuing education during each two-year licensure period. As part of the 100-hour requirement, the licensure board shall establish a minimum number of hours that must be completed in improving patient safety and risk management subject areas. Licensure boards shall also require individuals licensed to practice medicine and surgery to complete at least one hour of continuing medical education on nutrition during each two-year licensure period.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1980PN2500 - 2 - 1234567891011121314